Illinois, session 104th, HB3147.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Invest in Kids Act is reenacted and amended 5by changing Sections 40 and 65 and by adding Section 70 as 6follows: 7    (35 ILCS 40/Act title)8    An Act concerning education. 9    (35 ILCS 40/1)10    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)11    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Invest in 12Kids Act.13(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 14    (35 ILCS 40/5)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)16    Sec. 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:17    "Authorized contribution" means the contribution amount 18that is listed on the contribution authorization certificate 19issued to the taxpayer. 20    "Board" means the State Board of Education. 21    "Contribution" means a donation made by the taxpayer   HB3147- 2 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1during the taxable year for providing scholarships as provided 2in this Act.3    "Custodian" means, with respect to eligible students, an 4Illinois resident who is a parent or legal guardian of the 5eligible student or students. 6    "Department" means the Department of Revenue.7    "Eligible student" means a child who: 8        (1) is a member of a household whose federal adjusted 9    gross income the year before he or she initially receives 10    a scholarship under this program, as determined by the 11    Department, does not exceed 300% of the federal poverty 12    level and, once the child receives a scholarship, does not 13    exceed 400% of the federal poverty level; 14        (2) is eligible to attend a public elementary school 15    or high school in Illinois in the semester immediately 16    preceding the semester for which he or she first receives 17    a scholarship or is starting school in Illinois for the 18    first time when he or she first receives a scholarship; 19    and 20        (3) resides in Illinois while receiving a scholarship.21    "Family member" means a parent, child, or sibling, whether 22by whole blood, half blood, or adoption; spouse; or stepchild.23    "Focus district" means a school district which has a 24school that is either (i) a school that has one or more 25subgroups in which the average student performance is at or 26below the State average for the lowest 10% of student   HB3147- 3 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1performance in that subgroup or (ii) a school with an average 2graduation rate of less than 60% and not identified for 3priority. 4    "Jointly administered CTE program" means a program or set 5of programs within a non-public school located in Illinois, as 6determined by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 77.5 of this Act. 8    "Necessary costs and fees" includes the customary charge 9for instruction and use of facilities in general and the 10additional fixed fees charged for specified purposes that are 11required generally of non-scholarship recipients for each 12academic period for which the scholarship applicant actually 13enrolls, including costs associated with student assessments, 14but does not include fees payable only once and other 15contingent deposits that are refundable in whole or in part. 16The Board may prescribe, by rules consistent with this Act, 17detailed provisions concerning the computation of necessary 18costs and fees. 19    "Scholarship granting organization" means an entity that: 20        (1) is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3) of 21    the Internal Revenue Code; 22        (2) uses at least 95% of the qualified contributions 23    received during a taxable year for scholarships; 24        (3) provides scholarships to students according to the 25    guidelines of this Act; 26        (4) deposits and holds qualified contributions and any   HB3147- 4 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    income derived from qualified contributions in an account 2    that is separate from the organization's operating fund or 3    other funds until such qualified contributions or income 4    are withdrawn for use; and 5        (5) is approved to issue certificates of receipt. 6    "Technical academy" means a non-public school located in 7Illinois that: (1) registers with the Board pursuant to 8Section 2-3.25 of the School Code; and (2) operates or will 9operate a jointly administered CTE program as the primary 10focus of the school. To maintain its status as a technical 11academy, the non-public school must obtain recognition from 12the Board pursuant to Section 2-3.25o of the School Code 13within 2 calendar years of its registration with the Board. 14    "Qualified contribution" means the authorized contribution 15made by a taxpayer to a scholarship granting organization for 16which the taxpayer has received a certificate of receipt from 17such organization. 18    "Qualified school" means a non-public school located in 19Illinois and recognized by the Board pursuant to Section 202-3.25o of the School Code. 21    "Scholarship" means an educational scholarship awarded to 22an eligible student to attend a qualified school of their 23custodians' choice in an amount not exceeding the necessary 24costs and fees to attend that school. 25    "Taxpayer" means any individual, corporation, partnership, 26trust, or other entity subject to the Illinois income tax. For   HB3147- 5 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1the purposes of this Act, 2 individuals filing a joint return 2shall be considered one taxpayer.3(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21.) 4    (35 ILCS 40/7.5)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)6    Sec. 7.5. Determination of jointly-administered CTE 7programs.8    (a) Upon its own motion, or upon petition from a qualified 9school or technical academy, the State Board of Education 10shall determine whether a program or set of programs offered 11or proposed by a qualified school or technical academy 12provides coursework and training in career and technical 13education pathways aligned to industry-recognized 14certifications and credentials. The State Board of Education 15shall make that determination based upon whether the 16industry-recognized certifications or credentials that are the 17focus of a qualified school or technical academy's coursework 18and training program or set of programs (i) are associated 19with an occupation determined to fall under the LEADING or 20EMERGING priority sectors as determined through Illinois' 21Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act Unified State Plan 22and (ii) provide wages that are at least 70% of the average 23annual wage in the State, as determined by the United States 24Bureau of Labor Statistics. 25    (b) The State Board of Education shall publish a list of   HB3147- 6 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1approved jointly administered CTE programs on its website and 2otherwise make that list available to the public. A qualified 3school or technical academy may petition the State Board of 4Education to obtain a determination that a proposed program or 5set of programs that it seeks to offer qualifies as a jointly 6administered CTE program under subsection (a) of this Section. 7A petitioner shall file one original petition in the form 8provided by the State Board of Education and in the manner 9specified by the State Board of Education. The petitioner may 10withdraw his or her petition by submitting a written statement 11to the State Board of Education indicating withdrawal. The 12State Board of Education shall approve or deny a petition 13within 180 days of its submission and, upon approval, shall 14proceed to add the program or set of programs to the list of 15approved jointly administered CTE programs. The approval or 16denial of any petition is a final decision of the Board, 17subject to judicial review under the Administrative Review 18Law. Jurisdiction and venue are vested in the circuit court. 19    (c) The State Board of Education shall evaluate the 20approved jointly administered CTE programs under this Section 21once every 5 years. At this time, the State Board of Education 22shall determine whether these programs continue to meet the 23requirements set forth in subsection (a) of this Section. 24(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21.) 25    (35 ILCS 40/10)  HB3147- 7 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)2    Sec. 10. Credit awards. 3    (a) The Department shall award credits against the tax 4imposed under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of the 5Illinois Income Tax Act to taxpayers who make qualified 6contributions. For contributions made under this Act, the 7credit shall be equal to 75% of the total amount of qualified 8contributions made by the taxpayer during a taxable year, not 9to exceed a credit of $1,000,000 per taxpayer. 10    (b) The aggregate amount of all credits the Department may 11award under this Act in any calendar year may not exceed 12$75,000,000. 13    (c) Contributions made by corporations (including 14Subchapter S corporations), partnerships, and trusts under 15this Act may not be directed to a particular subset of schools, 16a particular school, a particular group of students, or a 17particular student. Contributions made by individuals under 18this Act may be directed to a particular subset of schools or a 19particular school but may not be directed to a particular 20group of students or a particular student.21    (d) No credit shall be taken under this Act for any 22qualified contribution for which the taxpayer claims a federal 23income tax deduction.24    (e) Credits shall be awarded in a manner, as determined by 25the Department, that is geographically proportionate to 26enrollment in recognized non-public schools in Illinois. If   HB3147- 8 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1the cap on the aggregate credits that may be awarded by the 2Department is not reached by June 1 of a given year, the 3Department shall award remaining credits on a first-come, 4first-served basis, without regard to the limitation of this 5subsection.6    (f) Credits awarded for donations made to a technical 7academy shall be awarded without regard to subsection (e), but 8shall not exceed 15% of the annual statewide program cap. For 9the purposes of this subsection, "technical academy" means a 10technical academy that is registered with the Board within 30 11days after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 12102nd General Assembly. 13(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21.) 14    (35 ILCS 40/15)15    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)16    Sec. 15. Approval to issue certificates of receipt. 17    (a) A scholarship granting organization shall submit an 18application for approval to issue certificates of receipt in 19the form and manner prescribed by the Department, provided 20that each application shall include: 21        (1) documentary evidence that the scholarship granting 22    organization has been granted an exemption from taxation 23    under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; 24        (2) certification that all qualified contributions and 25    any income derived from qualified contributions are   HB3147- 9 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    deposited and held in an account that is separate from the 2    scholarship granting organization's operating or other 3    funds until such qualified contributions or income are 4    withdrawn for use; 5        (3) certification that the scholarship granting 6    organization will use at least 95% of its annual revenue 7    from qualified contributions for scholarships; 8        (4) certification that the scholarship granting 9    organization will provide scholarships to eligible 10    students; 11        (5) a list of the names and addresses of all members of 12    the governing board of the scholarship granting 13    organization; and 14        (6) a copy of the most recent financial audit of the 15    scholarship granting organization's accounts and records 16    conducted by an independent certified public accountant in 17    accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in 18    the United States, government auditing standards, and 19    rules adopted by the Department. 20    (b) A scholarship granting organization whose owner or 21operator in the last 7 years has filed for personal bankruptcy 22or corporate bankruptcy in a corporation of which he or she 23owned more than 20% shall not be eligible to provide 24scholarships. 25    (c) A scholarship granting organization must not have an 26owner or operator who owns or operates a qualified school or   HB3147- 10 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1has a family member who is a paid staff or board member of a 2participating qualified school. 3    (d) A scholarship granting organization shall comply with 4the anti-discrimination provisions of 42 U.S.C. 2000d. 5    (e) The Department shall review and either approve or deny 6each application to issue certificates of receipt pursuant to 7this Act. Approval or denial of an application shall be made on 8a periodic basis. Applicants shall be notified of the 9Department's determination within 30 business days after the 10application is received. 11    (f) No scholarship granting organization shall issue any 12certificates of receipt without first being approved to issue 13certificates of receipt.14(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 15    (35 ILCS 40/20)16    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)17    Sec. 20. Annual review. 18    (a) Each scholarship granting organization that receives 19approval to issue certificates of receipt shall file an 20application for recertification on an annual basis. Such 21application for recertification shall be in the form and 22manner prescribed by the Department and shall include: 23        (1) certification from the Director or Chief Executive 24    Officer of the organization that the organization has 25    complied with and continues to comply with the   HB3147- 11 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    requirements of this Act, including evidence of that 2    compliance; and 3        (2) a copy of the organization's current financial 4    statements. 5    (b) The Department may revoke the approval of a 6scholarship granting organization to issue certificates of 7receipt upon a finding that the organization has violated this 8Act or any rules adopted under this Act. These violations 9shall include, but need not be limited to, any of the 10following: 11        (1) failure to meet the requirements of this Act; 12        (2) failure to maintain full and adequate records with 13    respect to the receipt of qualified contributions; 14        (3) failure to supply such records to the Department; 15    or 16        (4) failure to provide notice to the Department of the 17    issuance of certificates of receipt pursuant to Section 35 18    of this Act. 19    (c) Within 5 days after the determination to revoke 20approval, the Department shall provide notice of the 21determination to the scholarship granting organization and 22information regarding the process to request a hearing to 23appeal the determination. 24(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 25    (35 ILCS 40/25)  HB3147- 12 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)2    Sec. 25. Contribution authorization certificates. 3    (a) A taxpayer shall not be allowed a credit pursuant to 4this Act for any contribution to a scholarship granting 5organization that was made prior to the Department's issuance 6of a contribution authorization certificate for such 7contribution to the taxpayer. 8    (b) Prior to making a contribution to a scholarship 9granting organization, the taxpayer shall apply to the 10Department for a contribution authorization certificate.11    (c) A taxpayer who makes more than one contribution to a 12scholarship granting organization must make a separate 13application for each such contribution authorization 14certificate. The application shall be in the form and manner 15prescribed by the Department, provided that the application 16includes: 17        (1) the taxpayer's name and address; 18        (2) the amount the taxpayer will contribute; and19        (3) any other information the Department deems 20    necessary.21    (d) The Department may allow taxpayers to make multiple 22applications on the same form, provided that each application 23shall be treated as a separate application. 24    (e) The Department shall issue credit authorization 25certificates on a first-come, first-served basis based upon 26the date that the Department received the taxpayer's   HB3147- 13 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1application for the certificate subject to the provisions of 2subsection (e) of Section 10 of this Act. 3    (f) A taxpayer's aggregate authorized contribution amount 4as listed on one or more authorized contribution certificates 5issued to the taxpayer shall not exceed the aggregate of the 6amounts listed on the taxpayer's applications submitted in 7accordance with this Section. 8    (g) Each contribution authorization certificate shall 9state: 10        (1) the date such certificate was issued; 11        (2) the date by which the authorized contributions 12    listed in the certificate must be made, which shall be 60 13    days from the date of the issuance of a credit 14    authorization certificate; 15        (3) the total amount of authorized contributions; and16        (4) any other information the Department deems 17    necessary. 18    (h) Credit authorization certificates shall be mailed to 19the appropriate taxpayers within 3 business days after their 20issuance. 21    (i) A taxpayer may rescind all or part of an authorized 22contribution approved under this Act by providing written 23notice to the Department. Amounts rescinded shall no longer be 24deducted from the cap prescribed in Section 10 of this Act.25    (j) The Department shall maintain on its website a running 26total of the amount of credits for which taxpayers may make   HB3147- 14 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1applications for contribution authorization certification. The 2running total shall be updated every business day. 3(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 4    (35 ILCS 40/30)5    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)6    Sec. 30. Certificates of receipt. 7    (a) No scholarship granting organization shall issue a 8certificate of receipt for any qualified contribution made by 9a taxpayer under this Act unless that scholarship granting 10organization has been approved to issue certificates of 11receipt pursuant to Section 15 of this Act. 12    (b) No scholarship granting organization shall issue a 13certificate of receipt for a contribution made by a taxpayer 14unless the taxpayer has been issued a credit authorization 15certificate by the Department.16    (c) If a taxpayer makes a contribution to a scholarship 17granting organization prior to the date by which the 18authorized contribution shall be made, the scholarship 19granting organization shall, within 30 days of receipt of the 20authorized contribution, issue to the taxpayer a written 21certificate of receipt. 22    (d) If a taxpayer fails to make all or a portion of a 23contribution prior to the date by which such authorized 24contribution is required to be made, the taxpayer shall not be 25entitled to a certificate of receipt for that portion of the   HB3147- 15 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1authorized contribution not made.2    (e) Each certificate of receipt shall state: 3        (1) the name and address of the issuing scholarship 4    granting organization; 5        (2) the taxpayer's name and address; 6        (3) the date for each qualified contribution;7        (4) the amount of each qualified contribution;8        (5) the total qualified contribution amount; and 9        (6) any other information that the Department may deem 10    necessary. 11    (f) Upon the issuance of a certificate of receipt, the 12issuing scholarship granting organization shall, within 10 13days after issuing the certificate of receipt, provide the 14Department with notification of the issuance of such 15certificate in the form and manner prescribed by the 16Department, provided that such notification shall include: 17        (1) the taxpayer's name and address; 18        (2) the date of the issuance of a certificate of 19    receipt; 20        (3) the qualified contribution date or dates and the 21    amounts contributed on such dates; 22        (4) the total qualified contribution listed on such 23    certificates; 24        (5) the issuing scholarship granting organization's 25    name and address; and 26        (6) any other information the Department may deem   HB3147- 16 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    necessary. 2    (g) Any portion of a contribution that a taxpayer fails to 3make by the date indicated on the authorized contribution 4certificate shall no longer be deducted from the cap 5prescribed in Section 10 of this Act.6(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 7    (35 ILCS 40/35)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)9    Sec. 35. Reports. 10    (a) Within 180 days after the end of its fiscal year, each 11scholarship granting organization must provide to the 12Department a copy of a financial audit of its accounts and 13records conducted by an independent certified public 14accountant in accordance with auditing standards generally 15accepted in the United States, government auditing standards, 16and rules adopted by the Department. The audit must include a 17report on financial statements presented in accordance with 18generally accepted accounting principles. The audit must 19include evidence that no less than 95% of qualified 20contributions received were used to provide scholarships to 21eligible students. The Department shall review all audits 22submitted pursuant to this subsection. The Department shall 23request any significant items that were omitted in violation 24of a rule adopted by the Department. The items must be provided 25within 45 days after the date of request. If a scholarship   HB3147- 17 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1granting organization does not comply with the Department's 2request, the Department may revoke the scholarship granting 3organization's ability to issue certificates of receipt.4    (b) A scholarship granting organization that is approved 5to receive qualified contributions shall report to the 6Department, on a form prescribed by the Department, by January 731 of each calendar year. The report shall include: 8        (1) the total number of certificates of receipt issued 9    during the immediately preceding calendar year; 10        (2) the total dollar amount of qualified contributions 11    received, as set forth in the certificates of receipt 12    issued during the immediately preceding calendar year; 13        (3) the total number of eligible students utilizing 14    scholarships for the immediately preceding calendar year 15    and the school year in progress and the total dollar value 16    of the scholarships; 17        (4) the name and address of each qualified school for 18    which scholarships using qualified contributions were 19    issued during the immediately preceding calendar year, 20    detailing the number, grade, race, gender, income level, 21    and residency by Zip Code of eligible students and the 22    total dollar value of scholarships being utilized at each 23    qualified school by priority group, as identified in 24    subsection (d) of Section 40 of this Act; and 25        (5) any additional information requested by the 26    Department.   HB3147- 18 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (c) On or before the last day of March for each calendar 2year, for the immediately preceding calendar year, the 3Department shall submit a written report to the Governor, the 4President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 5Representatives, the Minority Leader of the Senate, and the 6Minority Leader of the House of Representatives regarding this 7Act. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the 8following information:9        (1) the names and addresses of all scholarship 10    granting organizations approved to issue certificates of 11    receipt;12        (2) the number and aggregate total of certificates of 13    receipt issued by each scholarship granting organization; 14    and15        (3) the information reported to the Department 16    required by subsection (b) of this Section.17    (d) The sharing and reporting of student data under this 18Section must be in accordance with the requirements of the 19Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act and the Illinois 20School Student Records Act. All parties must preserve the 21confidentiality of such information as required by law. Data 22reported by the Department under subsection (c) of this 23Section must not disaggregate data to a level that will 24disclose demographic data of individual students.25(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.)   HB3147- 19 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (35 ILCS 40/40)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)3    Sec. 40. Scholarship granting organization 4responsibilities. 5    (a) Before granting a scholarship for an academic year, 6all scholarship granting organizations shall assess and 7document each student's eligibility for the academic year. 8    (b) A scholarship granting organization shall grant 9scholarships only to eligible students. 10    (c) A scholarship granting organization shall allow an 11eligible student to attend any qualified school of the 12student's choosing, subject to the availability of funds. 13    (d) In granting scholarships, beginning in the 2022-2023 14school year and for each school year thereafter, a scholarship 15granting organization shall give priority to eligible students 16who received a scholarship from a scholarship granting 17organization during the previous school year. Second priority 18shall be given to the following priority groups:19        (1) (blank); 20        (2) eligible students who are members of a household 21    whose previous year's total annual income does not exceed 22    185% of the federal poverty level; 23        (3) eligible students who reside within a focus 24    district; and 25        (4) eligible students who are siblings of students 26    currently receiving a scholarship.   HB3147- 20 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (d-5) A scholarship granting organization shall begin 2granting scholarships no later than February 1 preceding the 3school year for which the scholarship is sought. Each priority 4group identified in subsection (d) of this Section shall be 5eligible to receive scholarships on a first-come, first-served 6basis until April 1 immediately preceding the school year for 7which the scholarship is sought, starting with the first 8priority group identified in subsection (d) of this Section. 9Applications for scholarships for eligible students meeting 10the qualifications of one or more priority groups that are 11received before April 1 must be either approved or denied 12within 10 business days after receipt. Beginning April 1, all 13eligible students shall be eligible to receive scholarships 14without regard to the priority groups identified in subsection 15(d) of this Section.16    (e) Except as provided in subsection (e-5) of this 17Section, scholarships shall not exceed the lesser of (i) the 18statewide average operational expense per student among public 19schools or (ii) the necessary costs and fees for attendance at 20the qualified school. A qualified school may set a lower 21maximum scholarship amount for eligible students whose family 22income falls within paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection 23(e); that amount may not exceed the necessary costs and fees 24for attendance at the qualified school and is subject to the 25limitations on average scholarship amounts set forth in 26paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, as applicable. The   HB3147- 21 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1qualified school shall notify the scholarship granting 2organization of its necessary costs and fees as well as any 3maximum scholarship amount set by the school. Scholarships 4shall be prorated as follows:5        (1) for eligible students whose household income is 6    less than 185% of the federal poverty level, the 7    scholarship shall be 100% of the amount determined 8    pursuant to this subsection (e) and subsection (e-5) of 9    this Section;10        (2) for eligible students whose household income is 11    185% or more of the federal poverty level but less than 12    250% of the federal poverty level, the average of 13    scholarships shall be 75% of the amount determined 14    pursuant to this subsection (e) and subsection (e-5) of 15    this Section; and16        (3) for eligible students whose household income is 17    250% or more of the federal poverty level, the average of 18    scholarships shall be 50% of the amount determined 19    pursuant to this subsection (e) and subsection (e-5) of 20    this Section.21    (e-5) The statewide average operational expense per 22student among public schools shall be multiplied by the 23following factors:24        (1) for students determined eligible to receive 25    services under the federal Individuals with Disabilities 26    Education Act, 2;  HB3147- 22 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1        (2) for students who are English learners, as defined 2    in subsection (d) of Section 14C-2 of the School Code, 3    1.2; and4        (3) for students who are gifted and talented children, 5    as defined in Section 14A-20 of the School Code, 1.1.6    (f) A scholarship granting organization shall distribute 7scholarship payments to the participating school where the 8student is enrolled. 9    (g) For the 2018-2019 school year through the 2022-2023 10school year, each scholarship granting organization shall 11expend no less than 75% of the qualified contributions 12received during the calendar year in which the qualified 13contributions were received. No more than 25% of the qualified 14contributions may be carried forward to the following calendar 15year. 16    (h) For the 2023-2024 school year, each scholarship 17granting organization shall expend all qualified contributions 18received during the calendar year in which the qualified 19contributions were received. No qualified contributions may be 20carried forward to the following calendar year. 21    (h-1) For the 2024-2025 school year and all school years 22following, each scholarship granting organization shall expend 23no less than 75% of the qualified contributions received 24during the calendar year in which the qualified contributions 25were received. No more than 25% of the qualified contributions 26may be carried forward to the following calendar year.   HB3147- 23 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (i) A scholarship granting organization shall allow an 2eligible student to transfer a scholarship during a school 3year to any other participating school of the custodian's 4choice. Such scholarships shall be prorated. 5    (j) With the prior approval of the Department, a 6scholarship granting organization may transfer funds to 7another scholarship granting organization if additional funds 8are required to meet scholarship demands at the receiving 9scholarship granting organization. All transferred funds must 10be deposited by the receiving scholarship granting 11organization into its scholarship accounts. All transferred 12amounts received by any scholarship granting organization must 13be separately disclosed to the Department. 14    (k) If the approval of a scholarship granting organization 15is revoked as provided in Section 20 of this Act or the 16scholarship granting organization is dissolved, all remaining 17qualified contributions of the scholarship granting 18organization shall be transferred to another scholarship 19granting organization. All transferred funds must be deposited 20by the receiving scholarship granting organization into its 21scholarship accounts.22    (l) Scholarship granting organizations shall make 23reasonable efforts to advertise the availability of 24scholarships to eligible students.25(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 102-1059, eff. 6-10-22; 26103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)   HB3147- 24 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (35 ILCS 40/45)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)3    Sec. 45. State Board responsibilities. 4    (a) Beginning in the 2019-2020 school year, students who 5have been granted a scholarship under this Act shall be 6annually assessed at the qualified school where the student 7attends school in the same manner in which students that 8attend public schools are annually assessed pursuant to 9Section 2-3.64a-5 of the School Code. Such qualified school 10shall pay costs associated with this requirement.11    (b) The Board shall select an independent research 12organization, which may be a public or private entity or 13university, to which participating qualified schools must 14report the scores of students who are receiving scholarships 15and are assessed pursuant to subsection (a) of this Section. 16Costs associated with the independent research organization 17shall be paid by the scholarship granting organizations on a 18per-pupil basis or by gifts, grants, or donations received by 19the Board under subsection (d) of this Section, as determined 20by the Board. The independent research organization must 21annually report to the Board on the year-to-year learning 22gains of students receiving scholarships on a statewide basis. 23The report shall also include, to the extent possible, a 24comparison of these learning gains to the statewide learning 25gains of public school students with socioeconomic backgrounds   HB3147- 25 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1similar to those of students receiving scholarships. The 2annual report shall be delivered to the Board and published on 3its website. 4    (c) Beginning within 120 days after the Board first 5receives the annual report by the independent research 6organization as provided in subsection (b) of this Section and 7on an annual basis thereafter, the Board shall submit a 8written report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, 9the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Minority 10Leader of the Senate, and the Minority Leader of the House of 11Representatives regarding this Act. Such report shall include 12an evaluation of the academic performance of students 13receiving scholarships and recommendations for improving 14student performance.15    (d) Subject to the State Officials and Employees Ethics 16Act, the Board may receive and expend gifts, grants, and 17donations of any kind from any public or private entity to 18carry out the purposes of this Section, subject to the terms 19and conditions under which the gifts are given, provided that 20all such terms and conditions are permissible under law. 21    (e) The sharing and reporting of student learning gain 22data under this Section must be in accordance with 23requirements of the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 24and the Illinois School Student Records Act. All parties must 25preserve the confidentiality of such information as required 26by law. The annual report must not disaggregate data to a level   HB3147- 26 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1that will disclose the academic level of individual students.2(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 3    (35 ILCS 40/50)4    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)5    Sec. 50. Qualified school responsibilities. A qualified 6school that accepts scholarship students must do all of the 7following:8        (1) provide to a scholarship granting organization, 9    upon request, all documentation required for the student's 10    participation, including the non-public school's cost and 11    student's fee schedules;12        (2) be academically accountable to the custodian for 13    meeting the educational needs of the student by:14            (A) at a minimum, annually providing to the 15        custodian a written explanation of the student's 16        progress; and17            (B) annually administering assessments required by 18        subsection (a) of Section 45 of this Act in the same 19        manner in which they are administered at public 20        schools pursuant to Section 2-3.64a-5 of the School 21        Code; the Board shall bill participating qualified 22        schools for all costs associated with administering 23        assessments required by this paragraph; the 24        participating qualified schools shall ensure that all 25        test security and assessment administration procedures   HB3147- 27 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1        are followed; participating qualified schools must 2        report individual student scores to the custodians of 3        the students; the independent research organization 4        described in subsection (b) of Section 45 of this Act 5        shall be provided all student score data in a secure 6        manner by the participating qualified school.7    The inability of a qualified school to meet the 8requirements of this Section shall constitute a basis for the 9ineligibility of the qualified school to participate in the 10scholarship program as determined by the Board.11(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 12    (35 ILCS 40/55)13    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)14    Sec. 55. Custodian and student responsibilities. 15    (a) The custodian must select a qualified school and apply 16for the admission of his or her child.17    (b) The custodian shall ensure that the student 18participating in the scholarship program takes the assessment 19required by subsection (a) of Section 45 of this Act.20    (c) Each custodian and each student has an obligation to 21comply with the qualified school's published policies. 22    (d) The custodian shall authorize the scholarship granting 23organization to access information needed for income 24eligibility determinations. 25(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.)   HB3147- 28 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (35 ILCS 40/60)2    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)3    Sec. 60. Recordkeeping; rulemaking; violations. 4    (a) Each taxpayer shall, for each taxable year for which 5the tax credit provided for under this Act is claimed, 6maintain records of the following information: (i) 7contribution authorization certificates obtained under Section 825 of this Act and (ii) certificates of receipt obtained under 9Section 30 of this Act. 10    (b) The Board and the Department may adopt rules 11consistent with and necessary for the implementation of this 12Act.13    (c) Violations of State laws or rules and complaints 14relating to program participation shall be referred to the 15Attorney General.16(Source: P.A. 100-465, eff. 8-31-17.) 17    (35 ILCS 40/65)18    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2025)19    Sec. 65. Credit period; repeal. 20    (a) A taxpayer may take a credit under this Act (i) for tax 21years beginning on or after January 1, 2018 and ending before 22January 1, 2024 and (ii) for tax years beginning on or after 23January 1, 2025. A taxpayer may not take a credit pursuant to 24this Act for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2024.   HB3147- 29 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (b) This Act is exempt from the provisions of Section 250 2of the Illinois Income Tax Act. This Act is repealed on January 31, 2025. 4(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21.) 5    (35 ILCS 40/70 new)6    Sec. 70. Continuation of Act; validation.7    (a) This amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 8manifests the intention of the General Assembly to extend the 9repeal of the Invest in Kids Act and have the Invest in Kids 10Act continue in effect on and after January 1, 2025. 11    (b) The Invest in Kids Act shall be deemed to have been in 12continuous effect since August 31, 2017 (the effective date of 13Public Act 100-465), and it shall continue to be in effect 14until it is otherwise lawfully repealed. All previously 15enacted amendments to the Invest in Kids Act Act taking effect 16on or after January 1, 2025, are hereby validated. 17    (c) All actions taken in reliance on or pursuant to the 18Invest in Kids Act by any person or entity are hereby 19validated. 20    (d) In order to ensure the continuing effectiveness of the 21Invest in Kids Act, it is set forth in full and reenacted by 22this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. Striking 23and underscoring are used only to show changes being made to 24the base text. This reenactment is intended as a continuation 25of the Act. It is not intended to supersede any amendment to   HB3147- 30 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1the Act that is enacted by the 104th General Assembly.  2    Section 10. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 3changing Section 224 as follows: 4    (35 ILCS 5/224)5    Sec. 224. Invest in Kids credit. 6    (a) For (i) taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 72018 and ending before January 1, 2024 and (ii) taxable years 8beginning on or after January 1, 2025, each taxpayer for whom a 9tax credit has been awarded by the Department under the Invest 10in Kids Act is entitled to a credit against the tax imposed 11under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act in an 12amount equal to the amount awarded under the Invest in Kids 13Act. 14    (b) For taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, for 15partners, shareholders of subchapter S corporations, and 16owners of limited liability companies, if the liability 17company is treated as a partnership for purposes of federal 18and State income taxation, the credit under this Section shall 19be determined in accordance with the determination of income 20and distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 21and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable 22years ending on or after December 31, 2023, partners and 23shareholders of subchapter S corporations are entitled to a 24credit under this Section as provided in Section 251.  HB3147- 31 -LRB104 09963 HLH 20033 b1    (c) The credit may not be carried back and may not reduce 2the taxpayer's liability to less than zero. If the amount of 3the credit exceeds the tax liability for the year, the excess 4may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 55 taxable years following the excess credit year. The tax 6credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is 7a tax liability. If there are credits for more than one year 8that are available to offset the liability, the earlier credit 9shall be applied first. 10    (d) A tax credit awarded by the Department under the 11Invest in Kids Act may not be claimed for any qualified 12contribution for which the taxpayer claims a federal income 13tax deduction.14    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 15250. 16(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22; 103-396, eff. 1-1-24.) 17    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 18becoming law.